Utah statutes.
57-3-102.   Record imparts notice -- Change in interest rate -- Validity of document -- Notice of unnamed interests -- Conveyance by grantee.

(1)  Each document executed, acknowledged, and certified, in the manner prescribed by this title, each original document or certified copy of a document complying with Section 57-4a-3, whether or not acknowledged, each copy of a notice of location complying with Section 40-1-4, and each financing statement complying with Section 70A-9a-502, whether or not acknowledged shall, from the time of recording with the appropriate county recorder, impart notice to all persons of their contents.

(2)  If a recorded document was given as security, a change in the interest rate in accordance with the terms of an agreement pertaining to the underlying secured obligation does not affect the notice or alter the priority of the document provided under Subsection (1).

(3)  This section does not affect the validity of a document with respect to the parties to the document and all other persons who have notice of the document.

(4)  The fact that a recorded document recites only a nominal consideration, names the grantee as trustee, or otherwise purports to be in trust without naming beneficiaries or stating the terms of the trust does not charge any third person with notice of any interest of the grantor or of the interest of any other person not named in the document.

(5)  The grantee in a recorded document may convey the interest granted to him free and clear of all claims not disclosed in the document in which he appears as grantee or in any other document recorded in accordance with this title that sets forth the names of the beneficiaries, specifies the interest claimed, and describes the real property subject to the interest.

